Missouri, session 2026, SB1027.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 590.1000, to read as
follows:
590.1000. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Automated license plate reader system", a system
of one or more cameras combined with computer algorithms to
convert images of license plates into data readable by a
computer;
(2) "Captured plate data", the global positioning
device coordinates, date and time, photograph, license plate
number, and any other data captured by an automated license
plate reader system;
(3) "License plate", the same meaning as is ascribed
to such term or the term "registration plate" in chapter 301;
(4) "Public highway", any public thoroughfare for
vehicles, including state highways, county roads, and public
streets, avenues, boulevards, parkways, and alleys in any
municipality.
2. No county, city, town, village, municipality, state
agency, or other political subdivision of this state shall

SB 1027 2
purchase, install, or use any automated license plate reader
system, or access or use plate data captured from vehicles
located on a public highway.
3. This section shall not apply with regard to
automated license plate reader systems affixed to vehicles
occupied by a peace officer.
4. This section shall not apply with regard to the
accessing or use of captured plate data captured by a third-
party vendor in accordance with sections 303.420 to 303.440.
✓